Illinois, session 104th, SB293.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/35)7    Sec. 35. Monetary award program. 8    (a) The Commission shall, each year, receive and consider 9applications for grant assistance under this Section. Subject 10to a separate appropriation for such purposes, an applicant is 11eligible for a grant under this Section when the Commission 12finds that the applicant:13        (1) is a resident of this State and a citizen or 14    permanent resident of the United States;15        (2) is enrolled or has been accepted for enrollment in 16    a qualified institution for the purpose of obtaining a 17    degree, certificate, or other credential offered by the 18    institution, as applicable; and 19        (3) in the absence of grant assistance, will be 20    deterred by financial considerations from completing an 21    educational program at the qualified institution of his or 22    her choice.23    (b) The Commission shall award renewals only upon the   SB0293- 2 -LRB104 04093 LNS 14117 b1student's application and upon the Commission's finding that 2the applicant:3        (1) has remained a student in good standing;4        (2) remains a resident of this State; and5        (3) is in a financial situation that continues to 6    warrant assistance.7    (c) All grants shall be applicable only to tuition and 8necessary fee costs. The Commission shall determine the grant 9amount for each student, which shall not exceed the smallest 10of the following amounts:11        (1) subject to appropriation, $5,468 for fiscal year 12    2009, $5,968 for fiscal year 2010, $6,468 for fiscal year 13    2011 and each fiscal year thereafter through fiscal year 14    2022, $8,508 for fiscal year 2023, and $10,896 for fiscal 15    year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, or such lesser 16    amount as the Commission finds to be available, during an 17    academic year;18        (2) the amount which equals 2 semesters or 3 quarters 19    tuition and other necessary fees required generally by the 20    institution of all full-time undergraduate students; or21        (3) such amount as the Commission finds to be 22    appropriate in view of the applicant's financial 23    resources.24    Subject to appropriation, the maximum grant amount for 25students not subject to subdivision (1) of this subsection (c) 26must be increased by the same percentage as any increase made   SB0293- 3 -LRB104 04093 LNS 14117 b1by law to the maximum grant amount under subdivision (1) of 2this subsection (c). 3    "Tuition and other necessary fees" as used in this Section 4include the customary charge for instruction and use of 5facilities in general, and the additional fixed fees charged 6for specified purposes, which are required generally of 7nongrant recipients for each academic period for which the 8grant applicant actually enrolls, but do not include fees 9payable only once or breakage fees and other contingent 10deposits which are refundable in whole or in part. The 11Commission may prescribe, by rule not inconsistent with this 12Section, detailed provisions concerning the computation of 13tuition and other necessary fees.14    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, no No 15applicant, including those presently receiving scholarship 16assistance under this Act, is eligible for monetary award 17program consideration under this Act after receiving a 18baccalaureate degree or the equivalent of 135 semester credit 19hours of award payments.20    (d-3) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year through 21the 2030-2031 academic year, an applicant who is otherwise 22eligible for grant assistance under this Section may receive 23grant assistance for an additional academic year after 24receiving a baccalaureate degree or the equivalent of 135 25semester credit hours if he or she (i) enrolls in a 26State-approved educator preparation program and (ii) within 5   SB0293- 4 -LRB104 04093 LNS 14117 b1years after receiving a Professional Educator License, teaches 2in this State for a minimum of 3 years. If at any time a person 3fails to meet the requirements of this subsection, he or she 4must repay the amount of additional assistance received to the 5Commission, in a manner as determined by the Commission, 6prorated according to the fraction of the teaching obligation 7not completed. 8    (d-5) In this subsection (d-5), "renewing applicant" means 9a student attending an institution of higher learning who 10received a Monetary Award Program grant during the prior 11academic year. Beginning with the processing of applications 12for the 2020-2021 academic year, the Commission shall annually 13publish a priority deadline date for renewing applicants. 14Subject to appropriation, a renewing applicant who files by 15the published priority deadline date shall receive a grant if 16he or she continues to meet the eligibility requirements under 17this Section. A renewing applicant's failure to apply by the 18priority deadline date established under this subsection (d-5) 19shall not disqualify him or her from receiving a grant if 20sufficient funding is available to provide awards after that 21date. 22    (e) The Commission, in determining the number of grants to 23be offered, shall take into consideration past experience with 24the rate of grant funds unclaimed by recipients. The 25Commission shall notify applicants that grant assistance is 26contingent upon the availability of appropriated funds.  SB0293- 5 -LRB104 04093 LNS 14117 b1    (e-5) The General Assembly finds and declares that it is 2an important purpose of the Monetary Award Program to 3facilitate access to college both for students who pursue 4postsecondary education immediately following high school and 5for those who pursue postsecondary education later in life, 6particularly Illinoisans who are dislocated workers with 7financial need and who are seeking to improve their economic 8position through education. For the 2015-2016 and 2016-2017 9academic years, the Commission shall give additional and 10specific consideration to the needs of dislocated workers with 11the intent of allowing applicants who are dislocated workers 12an opportunity to secure financial assistance even if applying 13later than the general pool of applicants. The Commission's 14consideration shall include, in determining the number of 15grants to be offered, an estimate of the resources needed to 16serve dislocated workers who apply after the Commission 17initially suspends award announcements for the upcoming 18regular academic year, but prior to the beginning of that 19academic year. For the purposes of this subsection (e-5), a 20dislocated worker is defined as in the federal Workforce 21Innovation and Opportunity Act. 22    (f) (Blank).23    (g) The Commission shall determine the eligibility of and 24make grants to applicants enrolled at qualified for-profit 25institutions in accordance with the criteria set forth in this 26Section. The eligibility of applicants enrolled at such   SB0293- 6 -LRB104 04093 LNS 14117 b1for-profit institutions shall be limited as follows:2        (1) Beginning with the academic year 1997, only to 3    eligible first-time freshmen and first-time transfer 4    students who have attained an associate degree.5        (2) Beginning with the academic year 1998, only to 6    eligible freshmen students, transfer students who have 7    attained an associate degree, and students who receive a 8    grant under paragraph (1) for the academic year 1997 and 9    whose grants are being renewed for the academic year 1998.10        (3) Beginning with the academic year 1999, to all 11    eligible students.12    (h) The Commission may award a grant to an eligible 13applicant enrolled at an Illinois public institution of higher 14learning in a program that will culminate in the award of an 15occupational or career and technical certificate as that term 16is defined in 23 Ill. Adm. Code 1501.301. 17    (i) The Commission may adopt rules to implement this 18Section. 19(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.